Nebraska, session 109, LB1211.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1211 LB1211
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-2444, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-2444 Sections 71-2444 to 71-2452 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Automated Medication Systems Act.
Sec. 2. Section 71-2449, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2449 (1) An automated medication distribution machine:
(a) Is subject to the requirements of section 71-2447 and, if it is
in a long-term care automated pharmacy, is subject to section 71-2451;
and
(b) Subject to section 71-2451, may be operated or used in a
hospital, long-term care facility, or assisted-living facility for
medication administration pursuant to a chart order or prescription by a
licensed health care professional; and .
(c) Subject to section 71-2447 and section 3 of this act, may be
operated in connection with a pharmacy located on property owned or
leased by the licensed pharmacy, whether within the interior of the
pharmacy building or affixed to, or situated on, the exterior of the
building.
(2) Drugs placed in an automated medication distribution machine
shall be in the manufacturer's original packaging or in containers
repackaged in compliance with state and federal laws, rules, and
regulations relating to repackaging, labeling, and record keeping.
(3) The inventory which is transferred to an automated medication
distribution machine in a hospital shall be excluded from the percent of
total prescription drug sales revenue described in section 71-7454.
Sec. 3. (1) In order for an automated medication system to be
operated by, or under the authority of, a pharmacy licensed under the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act and located in Nebraska, the
pharmacist in charge of the licensed pharmacy shall annually license the
automated medication system when such system is located on property owned
-2-

LB1211 LB1211
2026 2026
or leased by the licensed pharmacy, whether within the interior of the
pharmacy building or affixed to, or situated on, the exterior of the
building.
(2) The pharmacist in charge of a licensed pharmacy shall submit an
application for licensure or renewal of licensure to the Division of
Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services with a fee
in an amount determined by the Board of Pharmacy, not to exceed fifty
dollars. The application shall include:
(a) The name and location of the licensed pharmacy;
(b) The physical location of the automated medication system,
affirming that it is located on property owned or leased by the licensed
pharmacy, whether within the interior of the pharmacy building or affixed
to, or situated on, the exterior of the building; and
(c) The name of the pharmacist in charge of the licensed pharmacy.
(3) As part of the application process, the division shall conduct
an inspection of the automated medication system by a pharmacy inspector
as provided in section 38-28,101. The division shall also conduct
inspections of the operation of the automated medication system as
necessary.
(4) The division shall license an automated medication system which
meets the licensure requirements of this section.
(5) A pharmacist in charge of a licensed pharmacy shall apply for a
separate license for each location at which it operates one or more
automated medication systems. The licensed pharmacy shall be the provider
pharmacy for the automated medication system.
(6) The pharmacist in charge of the licensed pharmacy operating an
automated medication system shall:
(a) Identify a pharmacist responsible for the operation,
supervision, and development of policies and procedures of the automated
medication system. Compliance with this subdivision shall be sufficient
if the pharmacist monitors the automated medication system electronically
-3-

LB1211 LB1211
2026 2026
and keeps records of compliance with this requirement for a period of
five years;
(b) Implement the policies and procedures developed to comply with
section 71-2447;
(c) Assure compliance with the prescription drug storage and record
keeping requirements of the Pharmacy Practice Act;
(d) Assure compliance with the labeling requirements described in
subsection (7) of this section;
(e) Develop and implement policies for the verification of a
prescription drug by a pharmacist prior to being loaded into an automated
medication system or for the verification of a prescription drug by a
pharmacist prior to being released to a patient or caregiver; and
(f) Assure that each prescription drug is reviewed by a pharmacist
prior to the release of a drug by an automated medication system;
(7) Each prescription drug dispensed from an automated medication
system shall meet the labeling requirements applicable to prescription
drugs dispensed by a licensed pharmacist pursuant to section 71-2479.
(8) An automated medication system shall not dispense or make
available prescription medication to a patient or caregiver unless
pharmacist care has been offered and made available in a manner
consistent with section 38-2869.
(9) An automated medication system that is located outside a fully
enclosed building shall not be placed in a manner that exposes
medications to adverse environmental conditions or to security risks,
unless the Board of Pharmacy determines, through rule or case-specific
approval, that the automated medication system employs environmental
controls and physical security measures sufficient to protect medication
integrity and prevent diversion.
(10) An automated medication system operated in accordance with this
section shall not store, dispense, or otherwise make available a
controlled substance as defined under state or federal law.
-4-

LB1211 LB1211
2026 2026
(11) This section does not apply to a long-term care automated
pharmacy or an automated medication system operated in a long-term care
facility under section 71-2451.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-2444, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 71-2449, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-5-